Illinois, session 104th, HB1161.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Safety 5and Opportunity for Girls Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. For purposes of this Act:7    "Sex" means sex determined solely by a person's 8reproductive biology and genetics at birth.9    "Sex-segregated" means limited to or separated by sex. 10    Section 10. Sex-segregated spaces and programs. 11    (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no 12receipt of State funding may be contingent upon an educational 13institution forgoing the maintenance of sex-segregated spaces 14by the educational institution, including bathrooms and locker 15rooms. 16    (b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no 17receipt of State funding may be contingent upon an educational 18institution forgoing the maintenance of sex-segregated 19athletic or academic programs by the educational institution.